Georgia statutes. TITLE 11 Commercial Code
Subpart 4 Rights of Bank

11-9-340.
Effectiveness of right of recoupment or set-off against deposit account.

Exercise of recoupment or set-off.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, a bank with which a deposit account is maintained may exercise any right of recoupment or set-off against a secured party that holds a security interest in the deposit account.

Recoupment or set-off not affected by security interest.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, the application of this article to a security interest in a deposit account does not affect a right of recoupment or set-off of the secured party as to a deposit account maintained with the secured party.

When set-off ineffective.The exercise by a bank of a set-off against a deposit account is ineffective against a secured party that holds a security interest in the deposit account which is perfected by control under paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-104, if the set-off is based on a claim against the debtor.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-340, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-341.
Bank’s rights and duties with respect to deposit account.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of Code Section 11-9-340, and unless the bank otherwise agrees in an authenticated record, a bank’s rights and duties with respect to a deposit account maintained with the bank are not terminated, suspended, or modified by:

The creation, attachment, or perfection of a security interest in the deposit account;

The bank’s knowledge of the security interest; or

The bank’s receipt of instructions from the secured party.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-341, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-342.
Bank’s right to refuse to enter into or disclose existence of control agreement.

This article does not require a bank to enter into an agreement of the kind described in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-104, even if its customer so requests or directs. A bank that has entered into such an agreement is not required to confirm the existence of the agreement to another person unless requested to do so by its customer.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-342, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.